src/fst/test/older-gt-norm-yamls/N-IN-wayasit_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - wayasit - ok : # -m animate noun, hoof
     wayasit+N+IN+Sg: wayasit
     wayasit+N+IN+Pl: wayasita
     wayasit+N+IN+Loc: wayasitihk
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: wayasicis
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: wayasicisa
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: wayasicisihk

     wayasit+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: niwayasit
     wayasit+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiwayasit
     wayasit+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: owayasit
     wayasit+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: owayasitiyiw
     wayasit+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: niwayasitinân
     wayasit+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiwayasitinaw
     wayasit+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiwayasitiwâw
     wayasit+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: owayasitiwâw
     wayasit+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: owayasitiyiw

     wayasit+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: niwayasita
     wayasit+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiwayasita
     wayasit+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: owayasita
     wayasit+N+IN+Pl+Px4Sg: owayasitiyiwa
     wayasit+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: niwayasitinâna
     wayasit+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiwayasitinawa
     wayasit+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiwayasitiwâwa
     wayasit+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: owayasitiwâwa
     wayasit+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: owayasitiyiwa

     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: niwayasicis
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiwayasicis
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: owayasicis
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: owayasicisiyiw
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: niwayasicisinân
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiwayasicisinaw
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiwayasicisiwâw
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: owayasicisiwâw
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: owayasicisiyiw

     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: niwayasicisa
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiwayasicisa
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: owayasicisa
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px4Sg: owayasicisiyiwa
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: niwayasicisinâna
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiwayasicisinawa
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiwayasicisiwâwa
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: owayasicisiwâwa
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: owayasicisiyiwa

     wayasit+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: niwayasitihk
     wayasit+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kiwayasitihk
     wayasit+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: owayasitihk
     wayasit+N+IN+Px4Sg+Loc: owayasitiyihk
     wayasit+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: niwayasitinâhk
     wayasit+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kiwayasitinâhk
     wayasit+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kiwayasitiwâhk
     wayasit+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: owayasitiwâhk 
     wayasit+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: owayasitiyihk

     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: niwayasicisihk
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kiwayasicisihk
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: owayasicisihk
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px4Sg+Loc: owayasicisiyihk
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: niwayasicisinâhk
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kiwayasicisinâhk
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kiwayasicisiwâhk
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: owayasicisiwâhk
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: owayasicisiyihk
